District of Columbia statutes.
25-121

Alcohol training and education certification providers.

The Board shall approve providers of alcohol training and education certification programs for the purposes of:

(1)

The certification of managers licensed under § 25-120; and

(2)

Providing alcohol training and education to a licensee as a result of an order of the Board.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959